Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 308A.327, is amended to read: 308A.327 ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE; deleted text begin BOARD MEETINGSdeleted text end new text begin TRANSPARENCY; ELECTIONSnew text end . new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Open board meetings; remote participation. new text end new text begin (a) new text end A regular or special meeting of the board of directors of an electric cooperative deleted text begin that has more than 50,000 membersdeleted text end must be open to new text begin attendance by new text end all members of the cooperative. The board shall give reasonable prior notice of meetings. The board may close a meeting or a portion of a meeting, provided the board has made a written determination that a closed meeting is necessary for one of the following reasons: (1) to discuss personnel matters, compensation issues, labor negotiations, billing and credit information, or an issue that may tend to prejudice the reputation of an individual; (2) to discuss threatened or pending litigation, issues subject to an attorney-client privilege, or other legal information, the knowledge of which may have an adverse effect on the cooperative's legal position; or (3) to discuss or disclose information that, if discussed in an open meeting, would result in impairment of the cooperative's competitive or financial position, interfere with a business opportunity, or reveal proprietary information. For the purposes of clause (3), a business opportunity means an opportunity for substantial financial improvement of the cooperative that, if generally known, would likely jeopardize the opportunity itself. The board may close a portion of a meeting after announcing during an open meeting the item of business to be discussed during the closed portion. new text begin (b) An electric cooperative must provide the opportunity for all members to attend and participate in a special or regular meeting of the board of directors remotely through Internet access. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Member access to information. new text end new text begin An electric cooperative must maintain on the electric cooperative's website and allow members to access: new text end new text begin (1) the following electric cooperative documents: new text end new text begin (i) articles of incorporation; new text end new text begin (ii) bylaws; new text end new text begin (iii) board of directors meeting minutes; new text end new text begin (iv) annual reports; new text end new text begin (v) Internal Revenue Service Form 990; new text end new text begin (vi) audited financial statements; and new text end new text begin (vii) if the electric cooperative has an ownership interest in a subsidiary, nonconfidential and operational information regarding the subsidiary; and new text end new text begin (2) information regarding: new text end new text begin (i) dates, times, and locations of the upcoming board of directors meetings; new text end new text begin (ii) how to contact all members of the board of directors; new text end new text begin (iii) how to vote in board of directors elections; and new text end new text begin (iv) the number and percentage of members who voted in the most recent board of directors election, including the number of votes that were proxy votes cast on behalf of other members. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Access to membership list. new text end new text begin (a) The electric cooperative must make available to any member a list of all electric cooperative members, provided the member complies with this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) A member's request to access the electric cooperative's membership list must be: new text end new text begin (1) requested in good faith; and new text end new text begin (2) directly connected to and used for a purpose relevant to the member's interest as a member. new text end new text begin (c) A member is prohibited from using the membership list for commercial, sale, or similar purposes. new text end new text begin (d) An electric cooperative may require a member requesting access to the membership list to sign an affidavit certifying that the membership list must be used for a proper purpose and agreeing to pay damages to the electric cooperative if the membership list is used improperly. new text end new text begin (e) For the purposes of this subdivision, "membership list" means the names, street addresses, telephone numbers, and email addresses of every member of the electric cooperative. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Board of directors nominations. new text end new text begin An electric cooperative must allow a candidate to be nominated for election to the board of directors by a petition signed by 40 or more members of the electric cooperative. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Board elections; voting. new text end new text begin An electric cooperative must develop a secure system that maintains ballot secrecy while allowing members to vote in an election for the board of directors by mail and via the Internet. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Capital credits notification. new text end new text begin (a) An electric cooperative must notify each member annually, on a bill or otherwise, of the member's capital credit allocation for the previous calendar year. new text end new text begin (b) An electric cooperative must respond to a request by a member to calculate the member's cumulative but unretired capital credit allocation amassed since becoming a member of the electric cooperative within 45 days of the date the request is received. new text end new text begin (c) For the purposes of this subdivision, "capital credit allocation" means a member's share of the electric cooperative's surplus of revenues over costs during the most recent calendar year, allocated to each member based on the member's revenue contributed to the electric cooperative during the year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. Subdivision 5 applies to electric cooperative board elections held on or after September 1, 2025. new text end